Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.902

Participating in or permitting hazing—Loss of state-funded grants or awards—Loss of official recognition or control—Rules.

(1) A person who participates in the hazing of another shall forfeit any entitlement to state-funded grants, scholarships, or awards for a period of time determined by the institution of higher education.

(2) Any organization, association, or student living group that knowingly permits hazing to be conducted by its members or by others subject to its direction or control shall be deprived of any official recognition or approval granted by a public institution of higher education.

(3) The public institutions of higher education shall adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 1993 c 514 s 3.]